Tennessee, session 114, SB2245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-7-209(1), is amended by deleting
"thirty (30) days" and substituting "fifteen (15) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2245
012660
- 1 -